Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.100

Seller to provide surety bond or trust account—Action by state or injured person—Damages.

(1) If the seller makes any guarantee described in RCW 19.110.020(1)(c), the seller shall have a surety bond issued by a surety company authorized to do business in Washington or a trust account with a licensed and insured bank or savings institution located in the state of Washington. The trustee shall be acceptable to the director. The bond or the trust account shall be at least fifty thousand dollars. The director may, by rule or order, establish procedures for the initiation, operation, or termination of any bond or trust account required under this section.

(2) The bond or trust account shall be in the name of the state of Washington. It shall be for the benefit of the state and any person injured by any violation of this chapter, or by the seller's breach of any business opportunity contract or obligation arising from a business opportunity contract. The state may bring an action against the bond or trust account to recover penalties. The state or an injured person may bring an action against the bond or trust account for damages to the injured person. The liability of the surety or trustee shall be only for actual damages and shall not exceed the amount of the bond or trust account.

[ 1981 c 155 s 10.]